Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.165

Health care administration work groups—Secretary's participation.

Pursuant to RCW 48.165.030 and 48.165.035, the secretary or his or her designee shall participate in the work groups and, within funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, implement the standards to enable the department to transmit data to and receive data from the uniform process.

[ 2009 c 298 s 7.]